California statutes. Education Code
All moneys deposited in the 2016 State School Facilities Fund for the purposes of this chapter shall be available to provide aid to school districts, county superintendents of schools, and county boards of education of the state in accordance with the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1), as it read on January 1, 2015, as set forth in Section 101122, to provide funds to repay any money advanced or loaned to the 2016 State School Facilities Fund under any act of
 the Legislature, together with interest provided for in that act, and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101122.

(a) The proceeds from the sale of bonds, issued and sold for the purposes of this chapter, shall be allocated in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The amount of three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000) for new construction of school facilities of applicant school districts pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(2) The amount of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) shall be available for providing school
 facilities to charter schools pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 17078.52) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(3) The amount of three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000) for the modernization of school facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(4) The amount of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) for facilities for career technical education programs pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 17078.70) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(b) School districts may use funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) only for one or more of the following purposes in accordance with Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1:

(1) The purchase and installation of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials, and related
 costs.

(2) Construction projects or the purchase of furniture or equipment designed to increase school security or playground safety.

(3) The identification, assessment, or abatement in school facilities of hazardous asbestos.

(4) Project funding for high-priority roof replacement projects.

(5) Any other modernization of facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(c) Funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may also be utilized to provide new construction grants for eligible applicant county boards of education under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 for funding classrooms for severely handicapped pupils, or for funding classrooms for county community school pupils.

(d) Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section
 65995) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, as those provisions read on January 1, 2015, shall be in effect until the full amount of bonds authorized for new school facility construction pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) have been expended, or December 31, 2020, whichever is sooner. Thereafter, Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 65995) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code may be amended pursuant to law.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Kindergarten Through 12th Grade School Facilities Fiscal Provisions [101130. - 101141.]

101130.

(a) Of the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued and sold pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 101110), bonds in the amount of seven billion dollars ($7,000,000,000) not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 101140, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the
 purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 15909 at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101131.

The State School Building Finance Committee, established by Section 15909 and composed of the Governor, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, and the Superintendent, or their designated representatives, all of whom shall serve thereon without compensation, and a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum, is continued in existence for the purpose of this chapter. The Treasurer shall
 serve as chairperson of the committee. Two Members of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two Members of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with and provide advice to the committee to the extent that the advisory participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature. For the purposes of this chapter, the Members of the Legislature shall constitute an interim investigating committee on the subject of this chapter and, as that committee, shall have the powers granted to, and duties imposed upon, those committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and the Assembly. The Director of Finance shall provide assistance to the committee as it may require. The Attorney General of the state is the legal adviser of the committee.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101132.

(a) The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, are hereby incorporated into this chapter as though set forth in
 full within this chapter, except subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 of the Government Code shall not apply to the bonds authorized by this chapter.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the State Allocation Board is designated the “board” for purposes of administering the 2016 State School Facilities Fund.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101133.

(a) Upon request of the State Allocation Board, the State School Building Finance Committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to fund the related apportionments and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to fund those
 apportionments progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(b) A request of the State Allocation Board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be supported by a statement of the apportionments made and to be made for the purposes described in Sections 101121 and 101122.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101134.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that
 is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101135.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as
 the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 101138, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101136.

The State Allocation Board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account or any other approved form of interim financing, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds (exclusive of refunding bonds) that the
 committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The State Allocation Board shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the State Allocation Board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101137.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds
 and for the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101138.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds (exclusive of refunding bonds) that have been authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the 2016 State
 School Facilities Fund consistent with this chapter. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101139.

All money deposited in the 2016 State School Facilities Fund, that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest, except that amounts derived from premium may be reserved and used to pay the cost of the bond issuance prior to any transfer to the General
 Fund.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101140.

The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds
 issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds. Any bond refunded with the proceeds of refunding bonds as authorized by this section may be legally defeased to the extent permitted by law in the manner and to the extent set forth in the resolution, as amended from time to time, authorizing such refunded bond.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101141.

The people hereby find and declare that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. California Community College Facilities  [101142. - 101149.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [101142. - 101142.]

101142.

(a) The 2016 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury for deposit of funds from the proceeds of bonds issued and sold for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 is hereby
 authorized to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of providing funds to aid the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Community College Program Provisions [101143. - 101143.]

101143.

(a) From the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 101144), the sum of two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) shall be deposited in the 2016 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund for the purposes of this article. When appropriated, these funds shall be available for expenditure for the purposes of this article.

(b) The purposes of this article include assisting in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of the California Community Colleges.

(c) Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued and sold for the purposes of this article may be used to fund construction on existing campuses, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures, construction of facilities that may be used by more than one segment of public higher education (intersegmental), the renovation and reconstruction of facilities, site acquisition, the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities, which equipment shall have an average useful life of 10 years, and to provide funds for the payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings for facilities of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Community College Fiscal Provisions [101144. - 101149.5.]

101144.

(a) Of the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued and sold pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 101110), bonds in the total amount of two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 101149, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying
 out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101144.5.

(a) The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, are hereby incorporated into this chapter as though set forth
 in full within this chapter, except subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 of the Government Code shall not apply to the bonds authorized by this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, each state agency administering an appropriation of the 2016 Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund is designated as the “board” for projects funded pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The proceeds of the bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be available for the purpose of funding aid to the California Community Colleges for the construction on existing or new campuses, and their respective off-campus centers and joint use and intersegmental facilities, as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101145.

The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 shall authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter only to the extent necessary to fund the related apportionments for the purposes described in this chapter that are expressly authorized by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Pursuant to that legislative direction, the committee shall determine whether
 or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the purposes described in this chapter and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101145.5.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act
 which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101146.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as
 the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 101147.5, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101146.5.

The board, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 101144.5, may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account or any other approved form of interim financing, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds (exclusive
 of refunding bonds) that the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 101144.5, shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101147.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds
 and for the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101147.5.

(a) For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds (exclusive of refunding bonds) that have been authorized by the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall
 be deposited in the 2016 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund consistent with this chapter. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(b) Any request forwarded to the Legislature and the Department of Finance for funds from this bond issue for expenditure for the purposes described in this chapter by the California Community Colleges shall be accompanied by the five-year capital outlay plan that reflects the needs and priorities of the community college system and is prioritized on a statewide basis. Requests shall include a schedule that prioritizes the seismic retrofitting needed to significantly reduce, in the judgment of the particular college, seismic hazards in buildings identified
 as high priority by the college.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101148.

All money deposited in the 2016 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest, except that amounts derived from premium may be reserved and used to pay the cost of the bond issuance prior to any
 transfer to the General Fund.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101149.

The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds
 issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds. Any bond refunded with the proceeds of refunding bonds as authorized by this section may be legally defeased to the extent permitted by law in the manner and to the extent set forth in the resolution, as amended from time to time, authorizing such refunded bond.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

101149.5.

The people hereby find and declare that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 72. The Kindergarten Through Grade 12 Schools and Local Community College Public Education Facilities Modernization, Repair, and Safety Bond Act of 2024 [101400. - 101460.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [101400. - 101403.]

101400.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Kindergarten Through Grade 12 Schools and Local Community College Public Education Facilities Modernization, Repair, and Safety Bond Act of 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101401.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) A University of California, Berkeley report estimates that 85 percent of the classrooms in California are more than 25 years old, 30 percent of the classrooms are between 50 to 70 years old, and about 10 percent of the classrooms are 70 years old or older.

(b) Research on school building conditions and student outcomes finds a consistent relationship between poor facilities and poor performance by students. School facilities that are clean, in good repair, and designed to support high academic standards are more likely to support higher student achievement, regardless of student socioeconomic status. Students who receive instruction in
 buildings with good environmental conditions can earn test scores that are 5 to 17 percent higher than scores for students in substandard buildings.

(c) About one-third of new jobs in California will require some training beyond high school but less than a four-year degree. Career technical education, also known as vocational training, connects students to these career opportunities by providing industry-based skills.

(d) The School Facility Program is almost out of funding. School districts across California have submitted a total of $3,300,000,000 in new construction and modernization projects and they are waiting to be funded.

(e) There are over 1,000 charter schools in California, and those charter schools are primarily located in urban areas. Charter schools often face significant financial challenges in
 securing adequate facilities. Therefore, supporting charter school facilities is essential to ensuring that all students have access to high-quality learning environments. By investing in the construction and rehabilitation of charter school buildings, we can help ensure these schools can provide safe, modern, and conducive learning environments. This support is important for fostering educational innovation and providing equitable educational opportunities for all students.

(f) Small and disadvantaged school districts often face significant challenges in maintaining and upgrading their facilities. These districts serve some of the most vulnerable student populations and frequently lack the resources to address critical infrastructure needs.

(g) The California Community Colleges is the largest postsecondary educational system in the United States, historically serving
 approximately 2,100,000 students annually. The California Community Colleges have billions of dollars in need for construction of new facilities for enrollment growth and for modernization of existing facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101402.

(a) The incorporation of, or reference to, any provision of state statutory law in this part includes all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto.

(b) For purposes of this part, “State General Obligation Bond Law” means the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code), as it may be amended from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101403.

Bonds in the total amount of ten billion dollars ($10,000,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Sections 101430 and 101451, may be issued and sold for the
 purposes set forth in Sections 101420 and 101442. The bonds, when sold, issued, and delivered, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Kindergarten through Grade 12 [101410. - 101431.]



  ARTICLE 1. Kindergarten Through Grade 12 School Facilities Program Provisions [101410. - 101412.]

101410.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, not including the proceeds of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 101430, shall be deposited in the 2024 State School Facilities Fund established in the State Treasury under Section 17070.42, and shall be allocated by the State Allocation Board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101411.

All moneys deposited in the 2024 State School Facilities Fund for the purposes of this chapter shall be available to provide aid to school districts, county superintendents of schools, and county boards of education of the state in accordance with the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1), to provide funds to repay any money advanced or loaned to the 2024 State School Facilities Fund under any act of the Legislature, together with interest provided for in that act, and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101412.

(a) The proceeds from the sale of bonds issued and sold for the purposes of this chapter shall be allocated in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) (A) The amount of three billion three hundred million dollars ($3,300,000,000) for new construction of school facilities of applicant school districts pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part
 10 of Division 1 of Title 1. Of the amount allocated under this paragraph, up to 10 percent shall be available to small school districts pursuant to Article 11.5 (commencing with Section
 17078.35) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(B) Of the amount allocated under this paragraph, up to the amount necessary to fund the applications on the Applications Received Beyond Bond Authority List shall be available to support applications for the new construction of school facilities submitted pursuant to the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 on or before October 31, 2024.

(2) (A) The amount of
 four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000) for the modernization of school facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1. Of the amount allocated under this paragraph, up to 10 percent shall be available to small school districts pursuant to Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 17078.35) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(B) Of the amount allocated under this paragraph, up to the amount necessary to fund the applications on the Applications Received Beyond Bond Authority List shall be available
 to support applications for the modernization of school facilities submitted pursuant to the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 on or before October 31, 2024.

(C) Of the amount allocated under this paragraph, up to one hundred fifteen million dollars ($115,000,000) shall be available to address the remediation of lead in water pursuant to Article 10.7 (commencing with Section 17077.60) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(3) The amount of six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000)
 for providing school facilities to charter schools pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 17078.52) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(4) The amount of
 six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000) for facilities for career technical education programs pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 17078.70) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(b) School districts may use funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) only for one or more of the following purposes in accordance with Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1:

(1) The purchase and installation of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials, and related costs.

(2) Construction projects or the purchase of furniture or equipment designed to increase school security or playground safety.

(3) The identification, assessment, or abatement in school facilities of
 hazardous asbestos.

(4) Project funding for high-priority roof replacement projects.

(5) Any other modernization of facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(c) Funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may also be used to provide new construction grants for eligible applicant county boards of education under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 for funding classrooms for severely handicapped pupils, or for funding classrooms for county community school pupils.

(d) Of the amounts allocated under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), the State Allocation Board may provide a grant of five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 17078.46.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Kindergarten Through Grade 12 School Facilities Fiscal Provisions [101420. - 101431.]

101420.

(a) Of the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued and sold pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 101400), bonds in the amount of eight billion five hundred million dollars ($8,500,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 101430, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation
 Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 15909 at any times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101421.

The State School Building Finance Committee, established by Section 15909 and composed of the Governor, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, and the Superintendent, or their designated representatives, all of whom shall serve thereon without compensation, and a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum, is continued in existence to act as the committee, as defined in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section
 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), for purposes of this chapter. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. Two Members of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two Members of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with and provide advice to the committee to the extent that the advisory participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature. For purposes of this chapter, the Members of the Legislature shall constitute an interim investigating committee on the subject of this chapter and, as that committee, shall have the powers granted to, and duties imposed upon, those committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and the Assembly. The Director of Finance shall provide assistance to the committee as it may require. The Attorney General is the legal adviser of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101422.

(a) The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The provisions of that law, including all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, apply to those authorized bonds and this chapter, and are hereby incorporated into this chapter
 as though set forth in full within this chapter, except that subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 of the Government Code shall not apply to the bonds authorized by this chapter.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the State Allocation Board is designated the “board” for purposes of administering the 2024 State School Facilities Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101423.
